New York, session 2025-2026, S4936.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 65 of the public service law, as 2 amended by chapter 789 of the laws of 1930, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Every gas corporation, every electric corporation and every munici- 5 pality shall furnish and provide such service, instrumentalities and 6 facilities as shall be safe and adequate and in all respects just and 7 reasonable. All charges made or demanded by any such gas corporation, 8 electric corporation or municipality for gas, electricity or any service 9 rendered or to be rendered, shall be just and reasonable and not more 10 than allowed by law or by order of the commission. Every unjust or 11 unreasonable charge made or demanded for gas, electricity or any such 12 service, or in connection therewith, or in excess of that allowed by law 13 or by the order of the commission is prohibited. No gas corporation or 14 electric corporation shall increase rates by more than two percent as 15 measured on an annual basis. 16 § 2. Paragraphs 2 and 4 of subdivision (u) of section 1020-f of the 17 public authorities law, as added by section 7 of part A of chapter 173 18 of the laws of 2013, are amended to read as follows: 19 2. The authority and the service provider shall thereafter submit for 20 review to the department of public service any rate proposal that would 21 increase the rates and charges [and thus increase the aggregate revenues 22 of the authority by more than two and one-half]. Such rate proposal 23 shall not provide for an increase of such rates by more than two percent EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02276-01-5 S. 4936 2 1 to be measured on an annual basis[; provided, however, that the authori- 2 ty may place such rates and charges into effect on an interim basis, 3 subject to prospective rate adjustment; provided, further, that a final 4 rate plan issued by the authority that would not so increase such rates 5 and charges shall not be subject to the requirements of paragraph four 6 of this subdivision and shall be considered final for the purposes of 7 review under article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules. 8 The authority and/or the service provider may otherwise submit for 9 review to such department any rate proposal irrespective of its effect 10 on revenues]. 11 4. Any recommendations associated with a rate proposal submitted 12 pursuant to paragraphs one and two of this subdivision shall be provided 13 by the department of public service to the board of the authority imme- 14 diately upon their finalization by the department. Unless the board of 15 the authority makes a preliminary determination in its discretion that 16 any particular recommendation is inconsistent with the authority's sound 17 fiscal operating practices, any existing contractual or operating obli- 18 gations, or the provision of safe and adequate service, the board shall 19 implement such recommendations as part of its final rate plan and such 20 final determination shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this 21 subdivision and be considered final for the purposes of review under 22 article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules. The board 23 shall not approve a final rate plan that increases rates by more than 24 two percent. The board shall make any such preliminary determination of 25 inconsistency within thirty days of receipt of such recommendations, 26 with notice and the basis of such determination being provided to the 27 department of public service, and contemporaneously posted on the 28 websites of the authority and its service provider. The board shall 29 thereafter, within thirty days of such posting and with due advance 30 notice to the public, hold a public hearing with respect to its prelimi- 31 nary determination of inconsistency. At such hearing, the department of 32 public service shall present the basis for its recommendations, the 33 board shall present the basis for its determination of inconsistency and 34 the service provider may present its position. The authority and the 35 service provider may, during the time period before such public hearing 36 reach agreement with the department on disputed issues. Within thirty 37 days after such public hearing, the board of the authority shall 38 announce its final determination and planned implementation with respect 39 to any such recommendations. The authority's final determination of 40 inconsistency shall be subject to any applicable judicial review 41 proceeding, including review available under article seventy-eight of 42 the civil practice law and rules. 43 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 44 have become a law.